Massachusetts, session 194th, H2426.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The second paragraph of section 51 of chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby
amended by inserting after the words “local anesthesia agents” the following words:- and nitrous
oxide inhalation analgesia.
of 1